Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB986.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Article XVII-L of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, is amended by adding a subarticle to read:SUBARTICLE GPENNSYLVANIA SPACE ECONOMYSection 1794.1-L. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this subarticle shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:1234567891011121314151617181920212223 "Eligible commercial space company." An integrator of complete standalone spacecraft that utilizes supplier subcontractors for the development of systems and delivers products and services to end-use customers to achieve space mission objectives."Project facility." A facility located in this Commonwealth that is owned and operated by a qualified taxpayer and where the development of space technology systems and delivery of products and services to end-use customers to achieve space mission objectives is conducted by the qualified taxpayer at the project facility."Qualified taxpayer." A company that:(1) Conducts research, development or manufacturing of power, communications or other infrastructure-related space technology and that has received Federal contract funding in those areas.(2) Received Federal contract funding in the areas listed under paragraph (1) in the three years prior to applying for a tax credit.(3) Has delivered and operated a spacecraft in space at least once prior to award of the tax credit.(4) Has its corporate headquarters located in this Commonwealth.(5) Has at least 20% of the company's total revenue in a given year come from Federal contracts in infrastructure-related space technology, including, but not limited to, power, communications and transportation.(6) Has made good faith efforts to recruit and employ, and to encourage any contractors or subcontractors to recruit and employ, workers from the local labor market for 20250SB0986PN1131 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 employment.Section 1794.2-L. Eligibility for tax credits.In order to be eligible to receive a tax credit, a company shall demonstrate the following:(1) The company meets the criteria of a qualified taxpayer.(2) Confirmation that the company has filed all required State tax reports and returns for all applicable taxable years and paid any balance of State tax due as determined by assessment or determination by the department and not under timely appeal.(3) The company has given preference to use products manufactured in this Commonwealth and services performed by Pennsylvania companies as a demonstrable part of the company's procurement process, assuming the product or service is otherwise qualified for the function or task to be performed and is offered at or near fair market value.Section 1794.3-L. Application and approval of tax credit.(a) Determination of tax credit amount.--A qualified taxpayer shall be eligible for a tax credit in the following amounts, which shall match research and development funds from Federal contract funding:(1) For the first taxable year, up to $35,000,000.(2) For subsequent taxable years, up to $10,000,000.(b) Application process.--(1) An application for a tax credit under this subarticle must be submitted by March 1 for the prior calendar year.(2) The application shall require information as deemed necessary by the department, including, but not limited to:20250SB0986PN1131 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (i) documentation of conducted research, development or manufacturing of power, communications or other infrastructure-related space technology;(ii) documentation that the company has received Federal contract funding in the areas listed under subparagraph (i); and(iii) verification of qualified taxpayer status.(c) Review and approval.--(1) The department shall review applications and notify the applicant of approval or disapproval by May 1.(2) Upon approval, the department shall issue a certificate stating the amount of the tax credit granted for the eligible commercial space company.Section 1794.4-L. Tax credit management.(a) Sale or assignment.--Tax credits can be sold or assigned if held until the end of the calendar year. Approval from the department is required.(b) Purchasers and assignees.--A purchaser or assignee of a tax credit must claim the credit in the year of purchase, limited to 50% of qualified tax liabilities.(c) Pass-through entities.--A pass-through entity may transfer unused credits to shareholders or partners but may not claim the transferred credit.(d) Guidelines and regulations.--The department shall issue guidelines for the implementation of this subarticle, which shall be in effect until the department promulgates regulations for the implementation of this subarticle.(e) Reporting.--The department shall annually submit a report to the General Assembly on the effectiveness of the tax credits, including job creation and credit utilization. The 20250SB0986PN1131 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 department shall post the report on the department's publicly accessible Internet website.Section 1794.5-L. Applicability.This subarticle shall apply to an eligible commercial space company for a period of 15 years at each project facility.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0986PN1131 - 5 - 123456